Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska42-751.01
Transitional provision.

The changes to the Uniform Interstate Family Support Act made by Laws 2015, LB415, apply to proceedings begun on or after April 30, 2015, to establish a support order or determine parentage of a child or to register, recognize, enforce, or modify a prior support order, determination, or agreement, whenever issued or entered.

Laws 2015, LB415, § 61.